Utah statutes.
17-28-3.   Organization of council -- Accommodations.
(1)  The County Fire Civil Service Council shall select one of its members as
chair.
(2)  The county executive shall assign a qualified employee of the county to
act as secretary to the council and a qualified attorney to act as legal
counsel to the council, each of which shall be acceptable to the council and
shall act and serve without additional compensation.
(3)  The county executive shall provide suitable accommodations, equipment,
and necessary funds to enable the council of its county to properly conduct
its business.
